New York, session 2025-2026, A2173.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 208-a to read as follows: 3 § 208-a. Medicaid director. Notwithstanding any other provision of 4 this article, the position of medicaid director shall be appointed by 5 the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 7 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 8 appointments made on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00620-01-5